Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.545

Data collection and reporting rules.

(1) The department of health shall develop, based on recommendations in the public health services improvement plan and in consultation with affected groups or agencies, comprehensive rules for the collection and reporting of data relating to acts of violence, at-risk behaviors, and risk and protective factors. The data collection and reporting rules shall be used by any public or private entity that is required to report data relating to these behaviors and conditions. The department may require any agency or program that is state-funded or that accepts state funds and any licensed or regulated person or professional to report these behaviors and conditions. To the extent possible the department shall require the reports to be filed through existing data systems. The department may also require reporting of attempted acts of violence and of nonphysical injuries. For the purposes of this section "acts of violence" means self-directed and interpersonal behaviors that can result in suicide, homicide, and nonfatal intentional injuries. "At-risk behaviors," "protective factors," and "risk factors" have the same meanings as provided in *RCW 70.190.010. A copy of the data used by a school district to prepare and submit a report to the department shall be retained by the district and, in the copy retained by the district, identify the reported acts or behaviors by school site.

(2) The department is designated as the statewide agency for the coordination of all information relating to violence and other intentional injuries, at-risk behaviors, and risk and protective factors.

(3) The department shall provide necessary data to the local health departments for use in planning by or evaluation of any community network authorized under RCW 70.190.060.

(4) The department shall by rule establish requirements for local health departments to perform assessment related to at-risk behaviors and risk and protective factors and to assist community networks in policy development and in planning and other duties under chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.

(5) The department may, consistent with its general authority and directives under RCW 43.70.540 through 43.70.560, contract with a college or university that has experience in data collection relating to the health and overall welfare of children to provide assistance to:

(a) State and local health departments in developing new sources of data to track acts of violence, at-risk behaviors, and risk and protective factors; and

(b) Local health departments to compile and effectively communicate data in their communities.

[ 1998 c 245 s 76; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 202.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 70.190.010 was repealed by 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 13, effective June 30, 2012.

Finding—Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Contingent expiration date—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.